Colorado statutes. TITLE 23 Postsecondary Education
PART 2
LEVY AND COLLECTION OF TAXES

23-61.5-201. Procedure.

Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the board shall determine in each year the amount of money necessary to be raised by taxation and shall fix a rate of levy which, when levied upon every dollar of valuation for assessment of taxable property within the district, will raise the amount required by the district annually to supply funds to defray its expenses, including but not limited to the cost of postsecondary vocational services provided by the area technical college and capital construction.

The first rate of levy to be imposed shall be the mill levy which was contained in the petition for organization and which was voted upon in the election for organization. Thereafter, the rate of levy shall be determined as provided for in subsection (1) of this section.

In accordance with the schedule prescribed by section 39-5-128, C.R.S., the board shall certify to the board of county commissioners of each county within the district, or having a portion of its territory within the district, the rate so fixed in order that, at the time and in the manner required by law for the levying of taxes, such board of county commissioners shall levy such tax upon the valuation for assessment of all taxable property within the district.

Source:

L. 83:

Entire article added, p. 816, § 1, effective June 1.

L. 2016:

(1) amended, (HB 16-1082), ch. 58, p. 151, § 35, effective August 10.

23-61.5-202. County officers to levy and collect - lien.

It is the duty of the body having authority to levy taxes within each county to levy the taxes provided by section 23-61.5-201. It is the duty of all officials charged with the duty of collecting taxes to collect such taxes at the time and in the form and manner and with like interest and penalties as other taxes are collected and when collected to pay the same to the district. The payment of such collections shall be made monthly to the treasurer of the district. All taxes levied under this part 2, together with interest thereon and penalties for default in payment thereof, and all costs of collecting the same shall constitute, until paid, a perpetual lien on and against the property taxed, and such lien shall be on a parity with the tax lien of other general taxes.

Source:

L. 83:

Entire article added, p. 817, § 1, effective June 1.

23-61.5-203. Sale for delinquencies.

If the taxes levied are not paid, delinquent real property shall be sold at the regular tax sale for the payment of said taxes, interest, and penalties in the manner provided by the statutes of this state for selling real property for the nonpayment of general taxes. If there are no bids at said tax sale for the property so offered, said property shall be struck off to the county, and the county shall account to the district in the same manner as provided by law for accounting for school, town, and city taxes. Delinquent personal property shall be distrained and sold as provided by law.

Source:

L. 83:

Entire article added, p. 817, § 1, effective June 1.